Washington statutes.
RCW 18.106.210

Notice—Determination infraction committed.

Unless contested in accordance with this chapter, the notice of infraction represents a determination that the person to whom the notice was issued committed the infraction.

[ 1983 c 124 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1983 c 124: See note following RCW 18.106.020.